Hawaii statutes.
[§321-282] General duties of the
department. The department of health shall:

(1) Provide financial assistance, within the limits
of available funds in the financial assistance fund, for the medical care and
treatment of persons suffering from hemophilia who meet the standards of
eligibility established by the department; provided that the department may
contract with a private, nonprofit organization to carry out this function;

(2) Establish standards of eligibility for the
financial assistance provided under this part; and

(3) Adopt any necessary rules pursuant to chapter 91
to implement this part. [L 1983, c 280, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next